Hawaii statutes.
§633-34 Award of costs. In any action
pursuant to this chapter, the award of costs is in the discretion of the court,
which may include therein the reasonable cost of bonds and undertakings, and
other reasonable expenses incident to the action, incurred by either party. No
attorneys' fees or commissions shall be allowed or awarded under sections
607-14 and 607-17 by any judgment of the small claims division. [L 1970, c 182,
pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144, §27]

Note

Section 607-17 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next